Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1700.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1510.1. Communication impairment BARRIER designation. (a) Application.-- An individual with a communication impairment BARRIER may request a communication impairment BARRIER designation from the department by submitting an application, prescribed and furnished by the department, that contains the following:(1) A sworn statement signed by a qualified medical professional that:(i) Identifies the individual.<--<--<--<--1234567891011121314151617 (ii) Attests to the nature of the individual's communication impairment BARRIER . (2) Signature certification by the individual that the individual:(i) V oluntarily discloses the communication impairment BARRIER to the department and law enforcement agencies.(ii) Authorizes the department to update the individual's electronic records maintained by the department to reflect that the individual has a communication impairment BARRIER designation. (3) A clearly designated space for the individual to voluntarily provide and update emergency contact information for the individual, along with a statement that the individual understands the ability to update emergency contact information through the use of the department's emergency contact information system.(4) A statement that the individual understands that the knowing or intentional submission of false statements of material facts, or the commission or attempt to commit deception or fraud, on the application provided under this subsection is subject to the penalty under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904(b) (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities).(b) Validation and update.-- Upon receiving an application under subsection (a), the department shall independently validate the authenticity of the submitted application and update the individual's electronic records maintained by the department to reflect that the individual has a communication impairment BARRIER designation and any emergency contact information provided by the individual on the application. 20250HB1700PN3051 - 2 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Removal of designation.--An individual may request at any time the removal of a communication impairment BARRIER designation by submitting to the department an application for removal, created and distributed by the department, which also involves the removal of information related to the communication impairment BARRIER , but the individual may request the retention of emergency contact information in the individual's electronic records maintained by the department.(d) Fees.--(1) Subject to paragraph (2), a fee may not be imposed for the addition or removal of a communication impairment BARRIER designation or emergency contact information under this section.(2) An individual shall pay any fees associated with the renewal or duplication of a driver's license or identification card.(e) Identifier symbol.--(1) The EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3), THE department shall use the stylized lowercase "i" commonly used by the Invisible Disabilities Association as the sole identifier symbol to indicate a communication impairment BARRIER . (2) The identifier symbol under this subsection:(i) Shall be consistent in design and appearance on all driver's licenses and identification cards for all individuals with a communication impairment BARRIER . (ii) Shall be printed in a visible and clearly distinguishable location on the front of an individual's driver's license or identification card.(iii) Shall not imply or disclose any specific 20250HB1700PN3051 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 health conditions or details related to an individual's communication impairment BARRIER . (3) THE DEPARTMENT MAY, BY REGULATION, ADOPT THE USE OF AN ALTERNATIVE IDENTIFIER SYMBOL, IF A NATIONAL STANDARD IDENTIFIER SYMBOL IS DEVELOPED BY A NATIONAL DISABILITY OR ACCESSIBILITY RIGHTS ORGANIZATION.(f) Record sharing.--(1) The department shall provide record sharing with law enforcement agencies in this Commonwealth through existing networks that can be made accessible during a traffic stop, including the Commonwealth Law Enforcement Assistance Network.(2) The following information may be shared under this subsection:(i) An individual's communication impairment BARRIER designation, excluding any specific medical condition or details related to the individual's communication impairment BARRIER . (ii) An individual's emergency contact information.(3) The records maintained and shared by the department under this subsection shall not constitute a public record and shall be exempt from public access under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(g) Denial, cancellation or revocation.--(1) The department may deny, cancel or revoke a communication impairment BARRIER designation if the department determines:(i) the designation was fraudulently or deceptively obtained; or20250HB1700PN3051 - 4 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) an individual used the designation to intentionally and knowingly avoid compliance with a lawful order given by a law enforcement officer.(2) Following a determination under paragraph (1), the department shall provide the individual with a written notice that includes:(i) The reason for the denial, cancellation or revocation.(ii) Instructions on how to contest the denial, cancellation or revocation through a request for an informal hearing with the department not later than 30 days after the date of the notice.(3) If a timely request is made under paragraph (2), an informal hearing shall be held within 30 days of the request.(4) If, as a result of the informal hearing under paragraph (3), the department determines that the denial, cancellation or revocation was proper, the individual may appeal the informal departmental determination by requesting, not later than 30 days after the date of the determination, a formal hearing as prescribed by departmental regulations.(h) Criminal penalties.--(1) An individual who knowingly or intentionally submits false statements of material facts, or commits or attempts to commit deception or fraud, on the application provided under subsection (a) shall be subject to the penalty under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904(b).(2) If the department determines under subsection (g) that an individual falsely claimed a communication impairment BARRIER to avoid compliance with a lawful order, the individual shall be subject to the penalty under 18 Pa.C.S. § 20250HB1700PN3051 - 5 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 5101 (relating to obstructing administration of law or other governmental function).(i) Appeals.--(1) An individual may appeal an action taken by the department under this section in accordance with 2 Pa.C.S. Chs. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies) and 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).(2) The judicial review under this subsection shall:(i) Include a review of the facts of the case and a hearing of any testimony.(ii) Be limited to a determination of whether the communication impairment BARRIER designation should be reinstated by the department.(j) Qualified medical professional.--If a qualified medical professional knowingly or intentionally falsifies or misrepresents information, engages in deception or fraud or certifies a written false statement regarding an individual's communication impairment BARRIER on the application provided under subsection (a):(1) The qualified medical professional shall be subject to the penalty under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904(b).(2) T he respective licensing board of the qualified medical professional may revoke or suspend the license of the qualified medical professional or take other disciplinary or corrective actions as permitted by law, including disciplinary or corrective actions under the following, as applicable:(i) The act of May 22, 1951 (P.L.317, No.69), known as The Professional Nursing Law.20250HB1700PN3051 - 6 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) The act of October 5, 1978 (P.L.1109, No.261), known as the Osteopathic Medical Practice Act.(iii) The act of March 23, 1972 (P.L.136, No.52), known as the Professional Psychologists Practice Act.(iv) The act of December 21, 1984 (P.L.1253, No.238), known as the Speech-Language Pathologists and Audiologists Licensure Act.(v) The act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985.(k) Regulations.--The department shall MAY promulgate regulations necessary to implement, administer and enforce this subsection.(l) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Communication impairment BARRIER ." A health condition of an individual that may impede communication between the individual and a law enforcement officer during a traffic stop, including:(1) Deafness or being hard of hearing.( 2) An autism spectrum disorder. (3) A diagnosed speech impediment AND LANGUAGE DISORDER . (4) Any other HEALTH condition that the department , IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH, determines may reasonably impede an individual's ability to communicate with a law enforcement officer during a traffic stop."C ommunication impairment BARRIER designation." An identifier symbol that represents a communication impairment BARRIER of an individual and that: (1) Is printed on the front of the individual's driver's license or identification card issued by the Commonwealth.20250HB1700PN3051 - 7 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Becomes part of the individual's electronic records that are maintained by the department."Emergency contact information." The name, telephone number, address or other relevant information of an individual that is used for the sole purpose of contacting the individual in the event of an emergency involving another individual . "Qualified medical professional." As follows:(1) As the term "physician" is defined under 1 Pa.C.S. § 1991 (relating to definitions).(2) The term includes a qualified physician assistant, certified registered nurse practitioner, psychologist, speech-language pathologist or audiologist who is licensed to practice in this Commonwealth and who is acting within the qualified medical professional's scope of practice regarding an individual's communication impairment BARRIER . Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days 42 MONTHS.20250HB1700PN3051 - 8 - <--<--12345678910111213141516